District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-1008

Establishment of Office of Recycling.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 9, 36 DCR 595
Sept. 8, 1990, D.C. Law 8-154, § 2(c), 37 DCR 4045
Sept. 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-178, § 3(e), 41 DCR 5205
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 16, 43 DCR 530
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-1014.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3408.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 313(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, November 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 313(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).

Editor's Notes

For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.

D.C. Law 20-271 would have deleted “in conjunction with the Environmental Planning Commission” in (b)(3); however, this section had previously been repealed by D.C. Law 20-154.